Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1042
Termination of employment; transfer of benefits; when.

In the event that after four or more years of employment a firefighter terminates his or her employment for the purpose of becoming a firefighter employed by another city of the first class in Nebraska and such new employment commences within ninety days of such termination, such firefighter shall be entitled to transfer to the Firefighters Retirement System Fund of the city by which he or she is newly employed the full amount of his or her contribution and his or her vested portion of the value of his or her employer account at the time of termination. The transferred funds shall be administered by the retirement committee of the city to which transferred. Upon such transfer, the city and the retirement system from which the firefighter transferred shall have no further obligation to such firefighter or his or her beneficiary. Following the commencement of new employment, the transferring firefighter shall be deemed a new employee for all purposes of the retirement system of the city to which he or she transferred.

Beginning January 1, 1993, a firefighter who is to receive an eligible rollover distribution, within the meaning of section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code, from the retirement system may choose to have such distribution made in the form of a direct transfer to the trustee or custodian of a retirement plan eligible to receive the transfer under the code if the election is made in the form and within the time period required by the retirement committee and the plan to which such transfer is to be made will accept such transfer.

Laws 1983, LB 531, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 724, § 14;

Laws 1995, LB 574, § 25.